Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1377.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3106 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3106. Applicability of local ordinances, regulations and building codes.* * *(a.1) Annual report.--Consistent with the requirements under section 207(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, a planning agency of the county in which any portion of a condominium is located shall prepare annually and maintain a report identifying each condominium created and located within the municipality by the condominium's name and physical location and shall include:(1) the total land area and number of units of the condominium; and(2) to the extent reasonably available within the county government, the infrastructure of each condominium, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.* * *Section 2. Sections 3201 and 4106 of Title 68 are amended to read:§ 3201. Creation of condominium.A condominium may be created pursuant to this subpart only by recording a declaration executed, in the same manner as a deed, by all persons whose interests in the real estate will be conveyed to unit owners and by every lessor of a lease the expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or reduce its size, provided, however, in any such lease wherein the lessor is the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, a municipal government or any agency thereof, said lessor need not execute the declaration if they shall have previously given written consent to its filing and agreed to be bound by the provisions of the Pennsylvania Uniform Condominium Act, in which case said declaration shall be executed by the lessee then in possession of the subject property. The declaration shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium 20250HB1377PN1574 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is located in the same records as are maintained for the recording of deeds of real property and shall be indexed against each declarant as the grantor and the name of the condominium as the grantee. Upon the recording of the declaration, the declarant shall submit to the planning agency of each county in which the declaration is recorded a statement identifying, by name, physical location and municipality, the condominium created, including the total land area and number of units as well as the infrastructure of the condominium, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.§ 4106. Applicability of local ordinances, regulations and building codes.(a) General rule.--A zoning, subdivision, building code or other real estate tax or use law, ordinance or regulation may not prohibit the cooperative form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a cooperative which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership. Otherwise, no provision of this subpart invalidates or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code or other real estate tax or use law, ordinance or regulation except as is otherwise provided in section 4321(f) (relating to limited equity cooperatives).(b) Annual report.--Consistent with the requirements under section 207(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, a planning agency of the county in which any portion of a cooperative is located shall prepare annually and maintain a report identifying each cooperative created and located within the municipality by the cooperative's name and physical location 20250HB1377PN1574 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and shall include:(1) the total land area and number of units of the cooperative; and(2) to the extent reasonably available within the county government, the infrastructure of each cooperative, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.Section 3. Sections 4201 and 5106 of Title 68 are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 4201. Creation of cooperative ownership.* * *(a.1) Required disclosure.--Upon recording of the declaration or any separate instrument under subsection (a), the declarant or party recording the instrument shall submit to the planning agency of each county in which the declaration or instrument is recorded a statement identifying, by name, physical location and municipality, the cooperative created, including the total land area and number of units as well as the infrastructure of such cooperative, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.* * *§ 5106. Applicability of local ordinances, regulations and building codes.* * *(a.1) Annual report.--Consistent with the requirements under section 207(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, a planning agency of the county in which any portion of a planned community is located shall prepare annually and maintain a 20250HB1377PN1574 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report identifying each planned community created and located within the municipality by the community's name and physical location and shall include:(1) the total land area and number of units of the planned community; and(2) to the extent reasonably available within county government, the infrastructure of each planned community, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.* * *Section 4. Section 5201 of Title 68 is amended to read:§ 5201. Creation of planned community.A planned community may be created pursuant to this subpart only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed by all persons whose interests in the real estate will be conveyed to unit owners and by every lessor of a lease, the expiration or termination of which will terminate the planned community or reduce its size. If the lessor is the Commonwealth, a municipal government or any agency of either, the lessor need not execute the declaration if it has previously given written notice of its filing and agreed to be bound by the provisions of this subpart, in which case the declaration shall be executed by the lessee in possession of the subject property. The declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the planned community is located, must be indexed in the same records as are notarized for the recording of a deed and shall identify each declarant as the grantor and the name of the planned community as grantee. Upon the recording of the declaration, the declarant shall submit to the planning agency 20250HB1377PN1574 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of each county in which the declaration is recorded a statement identifying, by name, physical location and municipality, the planned community created, including the total land area and number of units as well as the infrastructure of such planned community, including information concerning the presence of sanitary sewer, water and storm water systems, recreation facilities and roadways.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1377PN1574 - 6 - 12345678